Hawaii statutes.
[§462A-3.5] Adequate supply of licenses.
(a) The director shall determine the number of pilots necessary to maintain an
efficient pilotage service in accordance with this chapter.

(b) The director, in consultation with users
of pilotage services, the department of transportation's harbors division, and
the professional association of port pilots in the State shall give primary
consideration to the public interest in ensuring that there is an adequate
supply of qualified pilots to safely and economically meet the requirements of
commerce. [L 2001, c 13, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next